Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.110

Dental hygiene examining committee—Generally.

There shall be a dental hygiene examining committee consisting of four practicing dental hygienists and one public member appointed by the secretary, to be known as the Washington dental hygiene examining committee. Each dental hygiene member shall be licensed and have been actively practicing dental hygiene for a period of not less than five years immediately before appointment and shall not be connected with any dental hygiene school. The public member shall not be connected with any dental hygiene program or engaged in any practice or business related to dental hygiene. Members of the committee shall be appointed by the secretary to prepare and conduct examinations for dental hygiene licensure. Members shall be appointed to serve for terms of three years from October 1 of the year in which they are appointed. Terms of the members shall be staggered. Each member shall hold office for the term of his or her appointment and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. Any member of the committee may be removed by the secretary for neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance, or misfeasance in office, after being given a written statement of the charges against him or her and sufficient opportunity to be heard thereon. Members of the committee shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2019 c 111 s 2; 1991 c 3 s 51; 1989 c 202 s 3.]